Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-914.02
Registered
voter; change of residence; entitled to vote; when.

If
a person who is registered to vote moves to a new residence within the same
county and precinct and has continuously resided in such county and precinct
since registering to vote but the voter registration register has not been
changed to reflect the move, the person shall be entitled to vote at the polling
place for the new residence.
The election commissioner or county clerk shall designate whether such a person
is entitled to a regular ballot upon completing a registration
application to update his or her voter registration record at the polling
place or a provisional ballot
as provided in section 32-915. The
election commissioner or county clerk shall implement the policy regarding
designation of ballots uniformly throughout the county. The election
commissioner or county clerk shall update the voter registration register
to reflect the change of address.

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 86;

Laws 1999, LB 234, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 23;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 36;

Laws 2010, LB325, § 4.